Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.142.020

Reports.

The University of Washington and Washington State University must report annually to the ways and means committee of the senate, the capital budget committee of the house of representatives, and the office of the state treasurer on any bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness issued under this chapter as a part of a public securities offering. The report shall include a summary of the total outstanding debt of the university, a summary of any public securities offerings issued that year by purpose, including rating information from at least one nationally recognized credit rating agency, issuance costs, interest rate information, sources of repayment, and a copy of the annual bondholder report filed by the University of Washington and Washington State University in accordance with Rule 15c2-12 of the securities and exchange commission.

[ 2007 c 24 s 3.]